Utah statutes.
16-10a-1440.   Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer in accordance with Title 67, Chapter  4a,  Unclaimed Property Act.



Amended by Chapter 198, 1995 General Session

